Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1 of Title 75A, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, artificial
intelligence systems, environmental elements, nonhuman animals, and
inanimate objects shall not be recognized as or granted the status
of personhood under the Constitution or laws of this state.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3546 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or
revoke the status of any municipality, corporation, association,
partnership, nonprofit organization, or other legal entity duly
recognized under the laws of this state prior to November 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
April 16, 2026 - DO PASS


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3546 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)